trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 304 Y 22
SFX 304 0 h/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 hmA/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 hm/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 hA/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 hn/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 k/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 k/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 kmA/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 km/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 kn/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 ny/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 nA/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 Ah/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 AhmA/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 Ahm/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 AhA/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 Ahn/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 Ak/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 Ak/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 AkmA/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 Akm/157 . 279
SFX 304 0 Akn/157 . 279
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 At/167 . 251
SFX 342 Y 5
SFX 342 0 h/147 . 234
SFX 342 0 hmA/147 . 234
SFX 342 0 hm/147 . 234
SFX 342 0 hA/147 . 234
SFX 342 0 hn/147 . 234
SFX 296 Y 12
SFX 296 0 Ah/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 AhmA/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 Ahm/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 AhA/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 Ahn/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 Ak/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 Ak/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 AkmA/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 Akm/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 Akn/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 Any/157 . 282
SFX 296 0 AnA/157 . 282
SFX 489 Y 1
SFX 489 0 A/144 . 239
SFX 299 Y 2
SFX 299 0 t/157 . 283
SFX 299 0 tA/157 . 283
SFX 346 Y 7
SFX 346 0 yh/172 . 299
SFX 346 0 yhmA/172 . 299
SFX 346 0 yhm/172 . 299
SFX 346 0 yhA/172 . 299
SFX 346 0 yhn/172 . 299
SFX 346 0 yny/172 . 299
SFX 346 0 ynA/172 . 299
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 0 yn/172 . 324
SFX 310 Y 12
SFX 310 0 wh/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 whmA/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 whm/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 whA/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 whn/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 wk/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 wk/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 wkmA/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 wkm/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 wkn/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 wny/157 . 280
SFX 310 0 wnA/157 . 280
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 0 0/207 . 228
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 A/157 . 292
SFX 386 Y 7
SFX 386 0 wh/193 . 249
SFX 386 0 whmA/193 . 249
SFX 386 0 whm/193 . 249
SFX 386 0 whA/193 . 249
SFX 386 0 whn/193 . 249
SFX 386 0 wny/193 . 249
SFX 386 0 wnA/193 . 249
SFX 466 Y 7
SFX 466 0 Ah/189 . 233
SFX 466 0 AhmA/189 . 233
SFX 466 0 Ahm/189 . 233
SFX 466 0 AhA/189 . 233
SFX 466 0 Ahn/189 . 233
SFX 466 0 Any/189 . 233
SFX 466 0 AnA/189 . 233
SFX 19 Y 12
SFX 19 0 Ath/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 AthmA/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 Athm/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 AthA/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 Athn/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 Atk/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 Atk/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 AtkmA/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 Atkm/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 Atkn/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 Aty/161 . 316
SFX 19 0 AtnA/161 . 316
SFX 467 Y 5
SFX 467 0 Ak/189 . 287
SFX 467 0 Ak/189 . 287
SFX 467 0 AkmA/189 . 287
SFX 467 0 Akm/189 . 287
SFX 467 0 Akn/189 . 287
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 0 An/189 . 237
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 0 0/187 . 228
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 0 0/205 . 262
SFX 585 Y 5
SFX 585 0 h/176 . 234
SFX 585 0 hmA/176 . 234
SFX 585 0 hm/176 . 234
SFX 585 0 hA/176 . 234
SFX 585 0 hn/176 . 234
SFX 425 Y 1
SFX 425 0 n/169 . 267
SFX 586 Y 5
SFX 586 0 k/176 . 236
SFX 586 0 k/176 . 236
SFX 586 0 kmA/176 . 236
SFX 586 0 km/176 . 236
SFX 586 0 kn/176 . 236
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 0/157 . 295
SFX 595 Y 5
SFX 595 0 h/198 . 234
SFX 595 0 hmA/198 . 234
SFX 595 0 hm/198 . 234
SFX 595 0 hA/198 . 234
SFX 595 0 hn/198 . 234
SFX 596 Y 5
SFX 596 0 k/198 . 236
SFX 596 0 k/198 . 236
SFX 596 0 kmA/198 . 236
SFX 596 0 km/198 . 236
SFX 596 0 kn/198 . 236
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 0 nA/161 . 325
SFX 402 Y 7
SFX 402 0 h/150 . 257
SFX 402 0 hmA/150 . 257
SFX 402 0 hm/150 . 257
SFX 402 0 hA/150 . 257
SFX 402 0 hn/150 . 257
SFX 402 0 ny/150 . 257
SFX 402 0 nA/150 . 257
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 yn/191 . 260
SFX 301 Y 2
SFX 301 0 n/157 . 296
SFX 301 0 nA/157 . 296
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 y/145 . 318
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 0 0/144 . 262
SFX 403 Y 1
SFX 403 0 n/150 . 226
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 0 0/177 . 228
SFX 418 Y 7
SFX 418 0 nh/201 . 235
SFX 418 0 nhmA/201 . 235
SFX 418 0 nhm/201 . 235
SFX 418 0 nhA/201 . 235
SFX 418 0 nhn/201 . 235
SFX 418 0 nny/201 . 235
SFX 418 0 nnA/201 . 235
SFX 565 Y 5
SFX 565 0 h/204 . 234
SFX 565 0 hmA/204 . 234
SFX 565 0 hm/204 . 234
SFX 565 0 hA/204 . 234
SFX 565 0 hn/204 . 234
SFX 419 Y 1
SFX 419 0 0/201 . 238
SFX 305 Y 6
SFX 305 0 t/157 . 297
SFX 305 0 t/157 . 297
SFX 305 0 t/157 . 297
SFX 305 0 tmA/157 . 297
SFX 305 0 tm/157 . 297
SFX 305 0 tn/157 . 297
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 0 yn/178 . 260
SFX 566 Y 5
SFX 566 0 k/204 . 236
SFX 566 0 k/204 . 236
SFX 566 0 kmA/204 . 236
SFX 566 0 km/204 . 236
SFX 566 0 kn/204 . 236
SFX 128 Y 13
SFX 128 0 ty/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tyh/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tyhmA/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tyhm/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tyhA/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tyhn/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tyk/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tyk/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tykmA/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tykm/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tykn/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 ty/145 . 312
SFX 128 0 tynA/145 . 312
SFX 529 Y 1
SFX 529 0 A/182 . 239
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 0 0/157 . 298
SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 0 ny/161 . 326
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 |t/156 . 285
SFX 349 Y 1
SFX 349 0 y/170 . 277
SFX 406 Y 7
SFX 406 0 Ah/205 . 233
SFX 406 0 AhmA/205 . 233
SFX 406 0 Ahm/205 . 233
SFX 406 0 AhA/205 . 233
SFX 406 0 Ahn/205 . 233
SFX 406 0 Any/205 . 233
SFX 406 0 AnA/205 . 233
SFX 533 Y 1
SFX 533 0 n/180 . 267
SFX 350 Y 7
SFX 350 0 yh/170 . 299
SFX 350 0 yhmA/170 . 299
SFX 350 0 yhm/170 . 299
SFX 350 0 yhA/170 . 299
SFX 350 0 yhn/170 . 299
SFX 350 0 yny/170 . 299
SFX 350 0 ynA/170 . 299
SFX 551 Y 1
SFX 551 0 n/155 . 267
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 y/145 . 323
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 yn/170 . 324
SFX 245 Y 11
SFX 245 0 h/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 hmA/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 hm/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 hA/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 hn/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 k/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 k/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 kmA/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 km/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 kn/156 . 294
SFX 245 0 nA/156 . 294
SFX 53 Y 24
SFX 53 0 th/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 thmA/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 thm/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 thA/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 thn/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tk/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tk/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tkmA/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tkm/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tkn/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tny/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tnA/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAh/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAhmA/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAhm/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAhA/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAhn/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAk/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAk/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAkmA/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAkm/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAkn/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAny/161 . 266
SFX 53 0 tAnA/161 . 266
SFX 478 Y 7
SFX 478 0 Ah/188 . 233
SFX 478 0 AhmA/188 . 233
SFX 478 0 Ahm/188 . 233
SFX 478 0 AhA/188 . 233
SFX 478 0 Ahn/188 . 233
SFX 478 0 Any/188 . 233
SFX 478 0 AnA/188 . 233
SFX 479 Y 5
SFX 479 0 Ak/188 . 287
SFX 479 0 Ak/188 . 287
SFX 479 0 AkmA/188 . 287
SFX 479 0 Akm/188 . 287
SFX 479 0 Akn/188 . 287
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 An/188 . 237
SFX 105 Y 12
SFX 105 0 Ath/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 AthmA/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 Athm/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 AthA/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 Athn/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 Atk/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 Atk/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 AtkmA/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 Atkm/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 Atkn/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 Aty/145 . 316
SFX 105 0 AtnA/145 . 316
SFX 150 Y 1
SFX 150 0 wA/145 . 243
SFX 531 Y 1
SFX 531 0 0/182 . 262
SFX 514 Y 7
SFX 514 0 Ah/163 . 233
SFX 514 0 AhmA/163 . 233
SFX 514 0 Ahm/163 . 233
SFX 514 0 AhA/163 . 233
SFX 514 0 Ahn/163 . 233
SFX 514 0 Any/163 . 233
SFX 514 0 AnA/163 . 233
SFX 515 Y 5
SFX 515 0 Ak/163 . 287
SFX 515 0 Ak/163 . 287
SFX 515 0 AkmA/163 . 287
SFX 515 0 Akm/163 . 287
SFX 515 0 Akn/163 . 287
SFX 353 Y 1
SFX 353 0 y/197 . 277
SFX 534 Y 7
SFX 534 0 nh/180 . 235
SFX 534 0 nhmA/180 . 235
SFX 534 0 nhm/180 . 235
SFX 534 0 nhA/180 . 235
SFX 534 0 nhn/180 . 235
SFX 534 0 nny/180 . 235
SFX 534 0 nnA/180 . 235
SFX 258 Y 12
SFX 258 0 |th/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |thmA/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |thm/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |thA/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |thn/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |tk/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |tk/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |tkmA/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |tkm/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |tkn/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |ty/159 . 253
SFX 258 0 |tnA/159 . 253
SFX 536 Y 1
SFX 536 0 0/180 . 238
SFX 535 Y 5
SFX 535 0 nk/180 . 240
SFX 535 0 nk/180 . 240
SFX 535 0 nkmA/180 . 240
SFX 535 0 nkm/180 . 240
SFX 535 0 nkn/180 . 240
SFX 404 Y 7
SFX 404 0 nh/150 . 286
SFX 404 0 nhmA/150 . 286
SFX 404 0 nhm/150 . 286
SFX 404 0 nhA/150 . 286
SFX 404 0 nhn/150 . 286
SFX 404 0 nny/150 . 286
SFX 404 0 nnA/150 . 286
SFX 396 Y 7
SFX 396 0 nh/206 . 286
SFX 396 0 nhmA/206 . 286
SFX 396 0 nhm/206 . 286
SFX 396 0 nhA/206 . 286
SFX 396 0 nhn/206 . 286
SFX 396 0 nny/206 . 286
SFX 396 0 nnA/206 . 286
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 0 tyn/159 . 268
SFX 161 Y 5
SFX 161 0 h/145 . 321
SFX 161 0 hmA/145 . 321
SFX 161 0 hm/145 . 321
SFX 161 0 hA/145 . 321
SFX 161 0 hn/145 . 321
SFX 153 Y 12
SFX 153 0 h/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 hmA/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 hm/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 hA/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 hn/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 k/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 k/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 kmA/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 km/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 kn/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 ny/145 . 258
SFX 153 0 nA/145 . 258
SFX 151 Y 12
SFX 151 0 wh/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 whmA/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 whm/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 whA/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 whn/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 wk/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 wk/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 wkmA/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 wkm/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 wkn/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 wny/145 . 259
SFX 151 0 wnA/145 . 259
SFX 477 Y 1
SFX 477 0 A/188 . 239
SFX 236 Y 12
SFX 236 0 Ath/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 AthmA/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 Athm/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 AthA/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 Athn/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 Atk/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 Atk/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 AtkmA/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 Atkm/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 Atkn/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 Aty/156 . 316
SFX 236 0 AtnA/156 . 316
SFX 38 Y 11
SFX 38 0 h/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 hmA/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 hm/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 hA/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 hn/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 k/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 k/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 kmA/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 km/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 kn/161 . 294
SFX 38 0 nA/161 . 294
SFX 410 Y 7
SFX 410 0 Ah/168 . 233
SFX 410 0 AhmA/168 . 233
SFX 410 0 Ahm/168 . 233
SFX 410 0 AhA/168 . 233
SFX 410 0 Ahn/168 . 233
SFX 410 0 Any/168 . 233
SFX 410 0 AnA/168 . 233
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 nA/145 . 325
SFX 567 Y 2
SFX 567 0 ny/204 . 230
SFX 567 0 nA/204 . 230
SFX 315 Y 5
SFX 315 0 h/207 . 234
SFX 315 0 hmA/207 . 234
SFX 315 0 hm/207 . 234
SFX 315 0 hA/207 . 234
SFX 315 0 hn/207 . 234
SFX 316 Y 5
SFX 316 0 k/207 . 236
SFX 316 0 k/207 . 236
SFX 316 0 kmA/207 . 236
SFX 316 0 km/207 . 236
SFX 316 0 kn/207 . 236
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 A/161 . 319
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 0 |t/178 . 285
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 0 A/206 . 239
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 ny/145 . 326
SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 0 ny/161 . 327
SFX 217 Y 12
SFX 217 0 |th/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |thmA/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |thm/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |thA/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |thn/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |tk/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |tk/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |tkmA/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |tkm/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |tkn/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |ty/167 . 253
SFX 217 0 |tnA/167 . 253
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 0 A/161 . 232
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 y/161 . 301
SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 0 yn/191 . 269
SFX 520 Y 7
SFX 520 0 Ah/203 . 233
SFX 520 0 AhmA/203 . 233
SFX 520 0 Ahm/203 . 233
SFX 520 0 AhA/203 . 233
SFX 520 0 Ahn/203 . 233
SFX 520 0 Any/203 . 233
SFX 520 0 AnA/203 . 233
SFX 10 Y 13
SFX 10 0 A/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 Ah/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 AhmA/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 Ahm/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 AhA/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 Ahn/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 Ak/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 Ak/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 AkmA/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 Akm/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 Akn/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 Ay/161 . 241
SFX 10 0 AnA/161 . 241
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 p/161 . 242
SFX 521 Y 5
SFX 521 0 Ak/203 . 287
SFX 521 0 Ak/203 . 287
SFX 521 0 AkmA/203 . 287
SFX 521 0 Akm/203 . 287
SFX 521 0 Akn/203 . 287
SFX 511 Y 7
SFX 511 0 nh/153 . 286
SFX 511 0 nhmA/153 . 286
SFX 511 0 nhm/153 . 286
SFX 511 0 nhA/153 . 286
SFX 511 0 nhn/153 . 286
SFX 511 0 nny/153 . 286
SFX 511 0 nnA/153 . 286
SFX 499 Y 7
SFX 499 0 nh/144 . 286
SFX 499 0 nhmA/144 . 286
SFX 499 0 nhm/144 . 286
SFX 499 0 nhA/144 . 286
SFX 499 0 nhn/144 . 286
SFX 499 0 nny/144 . 286
SFX 499 0 nnA/144 . 286
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 0 0/188 . 262
SFX 512 Y 5
SFX 512 0 nk/153 . 288
SFX 512 0 nk/153 . 288
SFX 512 0 nkmA/153 . 288
SFX 512 0 nkm/153 . 288
SFX 512 0 nkn/153 . 288
SFX 481 Y 7
SFX 481 0 Anh/188 . 317
SFX 481 0 AnhmA/188 . 317
SFX 481 0 Anhm/188 . 317
SFX 481 0 AnhA/188 . 317
SFX 481 0 Anhn/188 . 317
SFX 481 0 Anny/188 . 317
SFX 481 0 AnnA/188 . 317
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 An/161 . 245
